Utah statutes.
76-10-1603.   Unlawful acts.
(1)  It is unlawful for any person who has received any proceeds derived,
whether directly or indirectly, from a pattern of unlawful activity in which
the person has participated as a principal, to use or invest, directly or
indirectly, any part of that income, or the proceeds of the income, or the
proceeds derived from the investment or use of those proceeds, in the
acquisition of any interest in, or the establishment or operation of, any
enterprise.
(2)  It is unlawful for any person through a pattern of unlawful activity to
acquire or maintain, directly or indirectly, any interest in or control of any
enterprise.
(3)  It is unlawful for any person employed by or associated with any
enterprise to conduct or participate, whether directly or indirectly, in the
conduct of that enterprise's affairs through a pattern of unlawful activity.
(4)  It is unlawful for any person to conspire to violate any provision of
Subsection (1), (2), or (3).
